Tennessee, session 114, SB0648.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 58-2-107(e)(4), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting instead:
(4) Subject to any applicable requirements for compensation, commandeer or
utilize any private property, which term must not be construed to include firearms,
ammunition, or firearm or ammunition components, if the governor finds this necessary
to cope with the emergency; provided, that the power of eminent domain over real
property must not be used in any expedited manner;
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0648
000766
- 1 -